Wisconsin, session 2025, SB526.
do enact as follows:SB526,11Section 1. 118.60 (2) (a) 6. a. of the statutes is amended to read:SB526,2,62118.60 (2) (a) 6. a. Except as provided in subd. 6. c. and, d., and e., all of the 3private school’s teachers have a teaching license issued by the department or a 4bachelor’s degree or a degree or educational credential higher than a bachelor’s 5degree, including a masters or doctorate, from a nationally or regionally accredited 6institution of higher education.SB526,27Section 2. 118.60 (2) (a) 6. e. of the statutes is created to read:SB526,2,108118.60 (2) (a) 6. e. An individual employed by the private school who holds a 9substitute teacher permit issued by the department under s. 118.19 (7m) may teach 10at the private school as allowed under the substitute teacher permit.SB526,311Section 3. 119.23 (2) (a) 6. a. of the statutes is amended to read:SB526,2,1612119.23 (2) (a) 6. a. Except as provided in subd. 6. c. and d., all of the private 13school’s teachers have a teaching license issued by the department or a bachelor’s 14degree or a degree or educational credential higher than a bachelor’s degree, 15including a masters or doctorate, from a nationally or regionally accredited 16institution of higher education.SB526,417Section 4. 119.23 (2) (a) 6. d. of the statutes is created to read:SB526,2,2018119.23 (2) (a) 6. d. An individual employed by the private school who holds a 19substitute teacher permit issued by the department under s. 118.19 (7m) may teach 20at the private school as allowed under the substitute teacher permit.SB526,2,2121